en: Canned jackfruit
nl: Jackfruit in blik

en: Young canned jackfruit
nl: Jonge Jackfruit in blik

en: Dried jackfruit
fr: Jacquiers séchés, fruits du jacquier séchés

en: Aubergines, Eggplants, aubergine, eggplant
bg: Патладжани
de: Auberginen
es: Berenjenas
fr: Aubergines, aubergine
hr: Patlidžani
ja: ナス, なす, 茄子, ナスビ
la: Solanum melongena
nl: Aubergines
tr: Patlıcan

en: Fresh aubergines
bg: Пресни патладжани
de: Frische Auberginen
fr: Aubergines fraîches
hr: Svježi patlidžani
nl: Verse aubergines

en: Frozen aubergines
bg: Замразени патладжани
de: Tiefkühl-Auberginen, Gefrohrene Aubergines
es: Berenjenas congeladas
fr: Aubergines surgelées
hr: Smrznuti patlidžani
nl: Diepvries aubergines

en: Graffiti eggplants
fr: Aubergines graffiti

en: Prepared eggplants
fr: Aubergines préparées

en: Riste with eggplant and tomatoes and onions
fr: Ristes d’aubergines, Mélange d'aubergines et tomates et oignons

en: Beetroot, Beet
bg: Червено цвекло
de: Rote Bete
es: Remolachas
fi: punajuuret
fr: Betteraves
hr: Cikle
it: Barbabietola
ja: ビート, ビーツ, ビートルート
la: Beta vulgaris
lt: Burokėliai
nl: Rode bieten

en: Raw beetroot, Beet (raw), Beet (uncooked), Uncooked beet, Uncooked beetroots, Beetroot (raw)
bg: Сурово цвекло
de: Ungekochte rote Beete
fr: Betteraves crues, Betterave rouge crue
lt: nevirti burokėliai
nl: Verse rode bieten, Ongekookte rode bieten

en: Canned beetroot, Beet (canned), Canned beetroots, Canned beet, Beetroot (canned)
bg: Консервирано цвекло
de: Rote-Bete-Konserven
es: Remolacha en conserva
fi: purkitetut punajuuret
fr: Betteraves en conserve
hr: Konzervirana repa
it: Barbabietole in scatola
nl: Rode bieten in blik/pot

en: Fresh beetroot, Beetroot (fresh), Fresh beet
fr: Betteraves fraîches
hr: Svježa repa
lt: švieži burokėliai

en: Cooked beetroots, Beetroot (cooked), Beet (cooked), Cooked beet
fr: Betteraves rouges cuites
hr: Kuhana cikla
lt: Virti burokėliai
nl: Gekookte rode bieten

en: Vacuum-packed beetroot, Beetroot (vacuum-packed), Beet (vacuum-packed)
de: Rüben (Vakuumverpackt)
es: Remolachas envasadas al vacío
fr: Betteraves sous vide
it: Barbabietole sottovuoto
nl: Bieten (Vacuümverpakt), Vacuümverpakte bieten
pt: Beterraba embalada a vácuo

en: Frozen cooked beet, Frozen cooked beetroots
fr: Betteraves rouges cuites surgelées

en: Broccoli
xx: Broccoli
ar: قنبيط أخضر
az: Brokkoli
bg: Броколи
bn: ব্রকলি
bo: མེ་ཚལ་ལྗང་ཁུ།
bs: Brokula
ca: bròcoli
cs: brokolice
cy: Brocoli
de: Brokkoli
dv: ބުރޮކޯޅި
el: Μπρόκολο
eo: Brokolo
es: Brócolis, Brócoli, Floretes de brócoli
et: spargelkapsas
eu: Brokoli
fa: کلم بروکلی
fi: parsakaali
fr: Brocolis, Brocoli
ga: Brocailí
gl: Brócoli
gv: Callish Rangagh
he: ברוקולי
hr: brokule, brokula
ht: Bwokoli
hu: Brokkoli
hy: բրոկկոլի
id: Brokoli
is: Spergilkál
ja: ブロッコリー
jv: Brokoli
kk: Брокколи
kn: ಬ್ರಾಕಲಿ
ko: 브로콜리
la: Brassica oleracea italica
lo: ດອກກ້ວຍໄມ້ຝະລັ່ງ
lt: Brokoliai
lv: brokoļi
mk: Брокула
ml: ബ്രോക്കൊളി
mr: ब्रोकली
ms: Brokoli
nb: brokkoli
nn: brokkoli
nv: Chʼilzooł
os: Брокколи
pa: ਬਰੋਕਲੀ
pl: brokuł
pt: brócolos
ru: брокколи
sh: Brokula
sk: Brokolica
sl: Brokoli
sr: броколи
su: Brokoli
ta: புரோக்கோலி
te: బ్రొక్కొలి
th: บรอกโคลี
tl: Brokoli
tr: Brokoli
uk: броколі
ur: شاخ گوبھی
vi: Bông cải xanh
zh: 西蘭花

en: Fresh broccoli
de: Frischer Brokkoli
es: Brócoli fresco
fi: Tuore parsakaali
fr: Brocolis frais
hr: Svježe brokule

en: Cooked broccoli
fr: Brocolis cuits
hr: Kuhana brokula
nl: gekookte broccolis

en: Frozen broccolis, Frozen broccoli florets, Frozen broccoli
de: Tiefkühl-Brokkoli
es: Brócolis congelados, Brócoli en floretes congelado, Brócoli congelado
fi: pakastetut parsakaalinuput
fr: Brocolis surgelés, Brocolis en fleurettes surgelés, Brocoli surgelé
hr: Smrznuta brokula
it: Broccoli surgelati, Cime di broccoli surgelate
nl: Diepvries broccoli
pl: Brokuł (różyczki) głęboko mrożony